West Virginia, session 2025, HB2213.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. DANGEROUS WEAPONS. §61-7-9. Possession of machine guns, penalties. [Repealed.] NOTE: The purpose of this bill is to repeal the prohibition of the possession and the criminal penalties for that offense.Strike-throughs indicate language that would be stricken from a heading or the present law and underscoring indicates new language that would be added. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home